Tennessee, session 114, SB1593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-7-207(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(1) These revenues must be credited to the county road fund and used for the
construction, maintenance, and repair of the county system.
(2) Not later than ninety (90) days after the end of the county's fiscal year, each
county that receives revenue from a tax levied pursuant to this part shall provide an
annual written report to the commissioner of transportation, the chair of the
transportation and safety committee of the senate, and the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over transportation issues, detailing the
amount of revenue deposited into the county road fund during the previous fiscal year,
the amount of revenue spent by the county, and how those expenditures have been
designated and used for construction, maintenance, and repair of the county system
pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).
(3) Annual written reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) are subject to
audit by the comptroller of the treasury.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1593
009686
- 1 -